Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 4. Selection of School Boards in School Divisions Comprised of Counties Having County Manager or County Board Form of Government.

§ 22.1-47.
Composition of boards; appointment and terms; tie breakers.

The school board of a school division composed of a county having a county manager plan form of government provided for in Article 2 (§

15.2-702

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 15.2 shall be composed of not less than three nor more than seven members who shall be chosen by the board of county supervisors. The exact number of members shall be determined by the board of county supervisors. Each member shall be appointed for a term of four years, provided that initial appointments may be for such terms as will stagger the expiration of terms and that appointments to fill vacancies other than by expiration of term shall be for the unexpired term. The governing body of the county may also appoint a resident of the county to cast the deciding vote in case of a tie vote of the school board as provided in § 22.1-75. Each tie breaker, if any, shall be appointed for a four-year term whether the appointment is to fill a vacancy caused by expiration of term or otherwise. Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of this section, any such county may have an elected school board pursuant to Article 4.1 (§ 22.1-47.1 et seq.).

It is further provided that those counties having a county board form of government as contained in Chapter 4 (§

15.2-400

et seq.) of Title 15.2 shall select their school board as provided in §

15.2-410

, as amended.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-80, 22-83.1; 1956, c. 591; 1964, c. 100; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 246; 2018, c. 385.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 385 designated the former provisions as subsections A and B; and in subsection A, added the last sentence.